North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 4C. Structural Pest Control Act.
§ 106-65.30.
Inspectors; inspections and reports of violations; designation of resident agent.

For the enforcement of the provisions of this Article the Commissioner is authorized to appoint one or more qualified inspectors and such other employees as are necessary in order to carry out and enforce the provisions of this Article. The inspectors shall be known as “structural pest control inspectors.” The Commissioner may enforce compliance with the provisions of this Article by making or causing to be made periodical and unannounced inspections of work done by licensees and certified applicators under this Article who engage in or supervise any one or more phases of structural pest control as defined in

G.S. 106-65.25

. The Commissioner shall cause the prompt and diligent investigation of all reports of violations of the provisions of this Article and all rules and regulations adopted pursuant to the provisions hereof; provided, however, no inspection shall be made by a representative of the Commissioner of any property without first securing the permission of the owner or occupant thereof.

Prior to the issuance or renewal of a license or certified applicator’s identification card, every nonresident owner of a business performing any phase of structural pest control work shall designate in writing to the Commissioner or his authorized agent a resident agent upon whom service of notice or process may be made to enforce the provisions of this Article and rules and regulations adopted pursuant to the provisions hereof or any civil or criminal liabilities arising hereunder.

The Commissioner shall have authority to appoint personnel of the Structural Pest Control and Pesticides Division as special inspectors and said special inspectors are hereby vested with the authority to arrest with a warrant, or to arrest without a warrant when a violation of this Article is being committed in their presence or they have reasonable grounds to believe that a violation of this Article is being committed in their presence. Said special inspectors shall take offenders before the several courts of this State for prosecution or other proceedings. The provisions of this section do not apply to any person holding a valid structural pest control license, or a certified applicator’s identification card, or a registered technician’s identification card as issued under the provisions of this Article. Special inspectors shall not be entitled to the benefits of the Law Enforcement Officers’ Benefit and Retirement Fund or the benefits of the Law Enforcement Officers’ and Others Death Benefit Act as provided for in Articles 12 and 12A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, respectively.

History.

1955, c. 1017; 1967, c. 1184, s. 9; 1973, c. 556, s. 9; 1975, c. 570, s. 15; 1977, c. 231, s. 10; 1989, c. 725, s. 6; 1999-381, s. 8; 2013-265, s. 10.

§ 106-65.31.
Annual certified applicator card and license fee; registration of servicemen, salesmen, solicitors, and estimators; identification cards.

Certified Applicator’s Identification Card. — The fee for issuance or renewal of a certified applicator’s identification card shall be fifty dollars ($50.00). Within 75 days after the employment of a certified applicator, the licensee shall apply to the Division for the issuance of a certified applicator’s identification card. A certified applicator’s identification card shall expire on June 30 of each year and shall be renewed annually. All certified applicators who fail or neglect to renew their card on or before June 30 but make application before January 1 of the following year may have their card renewed without having to be reexamined unless the applicant is scheduled for periodic reexamination under regulations adopted pursuant to G.S. 106-65.27(d)(3). All applicants submitting applications for the renewal of their cards after June 30 shall not use or supervise the use of restricted use pesticides until a new card has been issued.Any certified applicator whose employment is terminated with a licensee or agent prior to the end of any license year may at any time prior to the end of the license year be reissued a certified applicator’s identification card for the remainder of the license year as an employee of another licensee or agency or as an individual for a fee of five dollars ($5.00). The licensee shall notify the Division of the termination or change in status of any certified applicator.Any certified applicator whose identification card is lost or destroyed or changed in any way may be reissued a new card for the remainder of the license year for a fee of five dollars ($5.00).

License. — The fee for the issuance or renewal of a license for any one phase of structural pest control shall be two hundred dollars ($200.00). Each additional phase shall be seventy-five dollars ($75.00). The fee for each subphase shall be fifteen dollars ($15.00). Licenses shall expire on June 30 of each year and shall be renewed annually. All licensees who fail or neglect to renew their license on or before June 30, but who make application before January 1 of the following year, may have their license renewed without having to be reexamined, unless the applicant is scheduled for periodic reexamination under regulations adopted pursuant to G.S. 106-65.27(d)(3). No structural pest control work may be performed until the license has been renewed or until a new license has been issued.Any licensee whose employment is terminated by his employer or any licensee who is transferred to another company or location other than the company or location shown on his license certificate, may at any time, have his license reissued for the remainder of the license year for a fee of ten dollars ($10.00).Any licensee whose license is lost or destroyed may secure a duplicate license for a fee of ten dollars ($10.00).

(b1)

Registration. —

Within 75 days after the hiring of an employee who is either an estimator, salesman, serviceman, or solicitor, the licensee shall apply to the Division for the issuance of an identification card for such employee. The application must be accompanied by a fee of forty dollars ($40.00) for each card. The card shall be issued in the name of the employee and shall bear the name of the employing licensee, the employer’s license number and phases, the name and address of the employer’s business, and such other information as the Committee may specify. The identification card shall be carried by the employee on his person at all times while performing any phase of structural pest control work. The card must be displayed upon demand by the Commissioner, the Committee, the Division, or any representative thereof, or the person for whom any phase of structural pest control work is being performed. A registered technician’s identification card must be renewed annually on or before June 30 by payment of a renewal fee of forty dollars ($40.00). If a card is lost or destroyed the licensee may secure a duplicate for a fee of five dollars ($5.00).The licensee shall notify the Division of the termination or change in status of any registered technician. All identification cards expire when a license expires.When a license is reissued, the licensee shall be responsible for registering and securing identification cards for all existing employees who engage in structural pest control within 10 days of the reissuance of the
license.A certified applicator who is not an employee of a licensed individual shall register the names of all employees under his supervision who are engaged in the performance of structural pest control with the Division and shall purchase a registered technician’s identification card for each such employee.

(b2)

No person shall act as an estimator, serviceman, salesman, solicitor, or agent for any licensee under this Article nor shall any such person be issued an identification card by the Committee who has within three years of the date of application for an identification card been convicted of, plead guilty or nolo contendere, or forfeited bond in any State or federal court for a felony or any violation of the North Carolina Structural Pest Control Act or any regulation promulgated by the Committee. This provision shall not apply to any person whose citizenship has been restored as provided by law.

(b3)

No person or business shall advertise as a contractor for structural pest control services nor actually contract for such services unless that person or business advertises or contracts in the name of the company shown on the license certificate of the licensee or identification card of the certified applicator who will perform the services.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this law, the Committee may adopt rules to provide for the issuance of licenses, certified applicator’s cards, and registered technician’s identification cards with staggered expiration dates and may prorate renewal fees on a monthly basis to implement such rules.

History.

1955, c. 1017; 1957, c. 1243, s. 4; 1967, c. 1184, s. 10; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; c. 556, s. 10; 1975, c. 570, s. 16; 1981, c. 495, s. 2; 1987, c. 368, s. 3; 1989, c. 544, s. 16; c. 725, s. 7; 1991, c. 636, s. 7; 1999-381, s. 9; 2010-31, s. 11.2(b); 2011-145, s. 31.8(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-31, s. 11.2(b), effective July 14, 2010, and applicable to fees assessed or collected on or after that date, in the first sentence in subsection (a), substituted “fifty dollars ($50.00)” for “thirty dollars ($30.00)”; in the first paragraph in subsection (b), substituted “two hundred dollars ($200.00)” for “one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00)” in the first sentence and “seventy-five dollars ($75.00)” for “sixty-five dollars ($65.00)” in the second sentence; and in the first paragraph in subsection (b1), substituted “forty dollars ($40.00)” for “twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” in the second sentence.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 31.8(b), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “forty dollars ($40.00)” for “twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” near the end of subsection (b1).

§ 106-65.32.
Administrative Procedure Act applicable.

A denial, suspension, or revocation of a license, certified applicator card, or identification card under this Article shall be made in accordance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

History.

1955, c. 1017; 1957, c. 1243, s. 5; 1967, c. 1184, s. 11; 1973, c. 556, s. 11; 1975, c. 570, s. 17; 1987, c. 827, s. 29.

§ 106-65.33.
Violation of Article, falsification of records, or misuse of registered pesticide a misdemeanor.

Any person who shall be adjudged to have violated any provision of this Article or who falsifies any records required to be kept by this Article or by the rules and regulations pursuant to this Article or who uses a registered pesticide in a manner inconsistent with its labeling shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. In addition, if any person continues to violate or further violates any provision of this Article after written notice from the Committee, the court may determine that each day during which the violation continued or is repeated constitutes a separate violation subject to the foregoing penalties.

Nothing in this Article shall be construed to require the Committee or the Commissioner to initiate, or attempt to initiate, any criminal or administrative proceedings under this Article for a minor violation of this Article whenever the Committee or Commissioner determines that the public interest will be adequately served in the circumstances by a suitable written notice or warning.

History.

1955, c. 1017; 1957, c. 1243, s. 6; 1967, c. 1184, s. 12; 1977, c. 231, s. 11; 1993, c. 539, s. 740; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1999-381, s. 10.

§ 106-65.34.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1967, c. 1184, s. 13.

§ 106-65.35.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 556, s. 12.

§ 106-65.36.
Reciprocity; intergovernmental cooperation.

The Committee may cooperate or enter into formal agreements with any other agency of this State or its subdivisions or with any agency of any other state or of the federal government for the purpose of enforcing any of the provisions of this Article.

History.

1973, c. 556, s. 13.

§ 106-65.37.
Financial responsibility.

The Committee may require by regulation from a licensee or certified applicator or an applicant for a license or certified applicator’s identification card under this Article evidence of his financial ability to properly indemnify persons suffering from the use or application of pesticides in the form of liability insurance or other means acceptable to the Committee. The amount of this insurance or financial ability shall be determined by the Committee.

Any regulation adopted by the Committee pursuant to

G.S. 106-65.29

to implement this section may provide for such conditions, limitations and requirements concerning the financial responsibility required by this section as the Committee deems necessary including but not limited to notice or reduction or cancellation of coverage and deductible provisions. Such regulations may classify financial responsibility requirements according to the separate license classifications and subclassifications as may be prescribed by the Committee.

History.

1975, c. 570, s. 18.

§ 106-65.38.
Disposition of fees and charges.

Except as otherwise provided in

G.S. 106-65.41

, all fees and charges received by the Division under this Article shall be deposited in the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services General Fund Budget for the purpose of administration and enforcement of this Article, with proper approved accounting procedures accounting for all expenditures and receipts.

History.

1977, c. 231, s. 12; 1997-261, s. 109; 1998-215, s. 5(b).

§ 106-65.39.
Judicial enforcement.

The Commissioner may apply to either the superior or district court for an injunction to prevent and restrain violations of this Article and the rules and regulations adopted under this Article, provided however, that the district court shall have original jurisdiction to hear and determine alleged misdemeanor violations of the Article and the rules and regulations of the Committee.

History.

1977, c. 231, s. 13; 1981, c. 836.

§ 106-65.40.
City privilege license tax prohibited.

A city, as defined in

G.S. 160A-1(2)

, may not levy a privilege license tax on persons engaged in a business licensed under this Article.

History.

1983, c. 193.

§ 106-65.41.
Civil penalties.

A civil penalty of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) may be assessed by the Committee against any person for any one or more of the causes set forth in G.S. 106-65.28(a)(1) through (12) and G.S. 106-65.28(a)(14) and (15), or who violates or directly causes a violation of any provision of this Article or any rule adopted pursuant to this Article. In determining the amount of any penalty, the Committee shall consider the degree and extent of harm caused by the violation. No civil penalty may be assessed under this section unless the person has been given an opportunity for a hearing pursuant to Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. Assessments may be collected, following judicial review, if any, of the Committee’s final decision imposing the assessment, in any lawful manner for the collection of a debt.

The clear proceeds of civil penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.

1987, c. 368, s. 1; 1989, c. 725, s. 8; 1998-215, s. 5(a); 1999-381, s. 11.